src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
PFX 5856 Y 1
PFX 5856 0 nojgors .
SFX 5857 Y 1
SFX 5857 ły ym .
PFX 5857 Y 1
PFX 5857 0 nojgors .
SFX 5858 Y 1
SFX 5858 ły y .
PFX 5858 Y 1
PFX 5858 0 nojgors .
SFX 5859 Y 1
SFX 5859 0 ach .
PFX 5859 Y 1
PFX 5859 zō zy .
SFX 5860 Y 1
SFX 5860 0 ami .
PFX 5860 Y 1
PFX 5860 zō zy .
SFX 5861 Y 1
SFX 5861 0 a .
PFX 5861 Y 1
PFX 5861 zō zy .
SFX 5862 Y 1
SFX 5862 0 ie .
PFX 5862 Y 1
PFX 5862 zō zy .
SFX 5863 Y 1
SFX 5863 0 owi .
PFX 5863 Y 1
PFX 5863 zō zy .
SFX 5864 Y 1
SFX 5864 b ōm .
PFX 5864 Y 1
PFX 5864 z zy .
SFX 5865 Y 1
SFX 5865 0 ōw .
PFX 5865 Y 1
PFX 5865 zō zy .
SFX 5866 Y 1
SFX 5866 0 ym .
PFX 5866 Y 1
PFX 5866 zō zy .
SFX 5867 Y 1
SFX 5867 0 y .
PFX 5867 Y 1
PFX 5867 zō zy .
SFX 5868 N 1
SFX 5868 or ara .
SFX 5869 N 1
SFX 5869 aba ob .
SFX 5870 Y 1
SFX 5870 ch 0 .
PFX 5870 Y 1
PFX 5870 ż j .
SFX 5871 N 1
SFX 5871 zło źle .
SFX 5872 Y 1
SFX 5872 ty si .
PFX 5872 Y 1
PFX 5872 0 noj .
SFX 5873 Y 1
SFX 5873 ty szego .
PFX 5873 Y 1
PFX 5873 0 noj .
SFX 5874 Y 1
SFX 5874 ty sze .
PFX 5874 Y 1
PFX 5874 0 noj .
SFX 5875 Y 1
SFX 5875 ty szo .
PFX 5875 Y 1
PFX 5875 0 noj .
SFX 5876 Y 1
SFX 5876 ty szōm .
PFX 5876 Y 1
PFX 5876 0 noj .
SFX 5877 Y 1
SFX 5877 ty szych .
PFX 5877 Y 1
PFX 5877 0 noj .
SFX 5878 Y 1
SFX 5878 ty szyj .
PFX 5878 Y 1
PFX 5878 0 noj .
SFX 5879 Y 1
SFX 5879 ty szymi .
PFX 5879 Y 1
PFX 5879 0 noj .
SFX 5880 Y 1
SFX 5880 ty szymu .
PFX 5880 Y 1
PFX 5880 0 noj .
SFX 5881 Y 1
SFX 5881 ty szym .
PFX 5881 Y 1
PFX 5881 0 noj .
SFX 5882 Y 1
SFX 5882 ty szy .
PFX 5882 Y 1
PFX 5882 0 noj .
SFX 5883 N 1
SFX 5883 ty si .
SFX 5884 N 1
SFX 5884 ty szego .
SFX 5885 N 1
SFX 5885 ty sze .
SFX 5886 N 1
SFX 5886 ty szo .
SFX 5887 N 1
SFX 5887 ty szōm .
SFX 5888 N 1
SFX 5888 ty szych .
SFX 5889 N 1
SFX 5889 ty szyj .
SFX 5890 N 1
SFX 5890 ty szymi .
SFX 5891 N 1
SFX 5891 ty szymu .
SFX 5892 N 1
SFX 5892 ty szym .
SFX 5893 N 1
SFX 5893 ty szy .
SFX 5894 N 1
SFX 5894 0 iach .
SFX 5895 N 1
SFX 5895 0 iami .
SFX 5896 N 1
SFX 5896 0 iōm .
SFX 5897 N 1
SFX 5897 0 iōw .
SFX 5898 N 1
SFX 5898 reć arōłbych .
SFX 5899 N 1
SFX 5899 reć arōłbyś .
SFX 5900 N 1
SFX 5900 reć arōłby .
SFX 5901 N 1
SFX 5901 reć arōłch .
SFX 5902 N 1
SFX 5902 reć arōłech .
SFX 5903 N 1
SFX 5903 reć arōłś .
SFX 5904 N 1
SFX 5904 reć arōł .
SFX 5905 N 1
SFX 5905 reć arylibymy .
SFX 5906 N 1
SFX 5906 reć arylibyście .
SFX 5907 N 1
SFX 5907 reć aryliby .
SFX 5908 N 1
SFX 5908 reć arylichmy .
SFX 5909 N 1
SFX 5909 reć arylimy .
SFX 5910 N 1
SFX 5910 reć aryliście .
SFX 5911 N 1
SFX 5911 reć aryli .
SFX 5912 N 1
SFX 5912 reć aryłabych .
SFX 5913 N 1
SFX 5913 reć aryłabyś .
SFX 5914 N 1
SFX 5914 reć aryłaby .
SFX 5915 N 1
SFX 5915 reć aryłach .
SFX 5916 N 1
SFX 5916 reć aryłaś .
SFX 5917 N 1
SFX 5917 reć aryła .
SFX 5918 N 1
SFX 5918 reć aryłoby .
SFX 5919 N 1
SFX 5919 reć aryło .
SFX 5920 N 1
SFX 5920 reć aryłybymy .
SFX 5921 N 1
SFX 5921 reć aryłybyście .
SFX 5922 N 1
SFX 5922 reć aryłyby .
SFX 5923 N 1
SFX 5923 reć aryłychmy .
SFX 5924 N 1
SFX 5924 reć aryłymy .
SFX 5925 N 1
SFX 5925 reć aryłyście .
SFX 5926 N 1
SFX 5926 reć aryły .
SFX 5927 Y 1
SFX 5927 zny źniyjsi .
PFX 5927 Y 1
PFX 5927 0 noj .
SFX 5928 Y 1
SFX 5928 zny źniyjszego .
PFX 5928 Y 1
PFX 5928 0 noj .
SFX 5929 Y 1
SFX 5929 zny źniyjsze .
PFX 5929 Y 1
PFX 5929 0 noj .
SFX 5930 Y 1
SFX 5930 zny źniyjszo .
PFX 5930 Y 1
PFX 5930 0 noj .
SFX 5931 Y 1
SFX 5931 zny źniyjszōm .
PFX 5931 Y 1
PFX 5931 0 noj .
SFX 5932 Y 1
SFX 5932 zny źniyjszych .
PFX 5932 Y 1
PFX 5932 0 noj .
SFX 5933 Y 1
SFX 5933 zny źniyjszyj .
PFX 5933 Y 1
PFX 5933 0 noj .
SFX 5934 Y 1
SFX 5934 zny źniyjszymi .
PFX 5934 Y 1
PFX 5934 0 noj .
SFX 5935 Y 1
SFX 5935 zny źniyjszymu .
PFX 5935 Y 1
PFX 5935 0 noj .
SFX 5936 Y 1
SFX 5936 zny źniyjszym .
PFX 5936 Y 1
PFX 5936 0 noj .
SFX 5937 Y 1
SFX 5937 zny źniyjszy .
PFX 5937 Y 1
PFX 5937 0 noj .
SFX 5938 N 1
SFX 5938 zny źniyjsi .
SFX 5939 N 1
SFX 5939 zny źniyjszego .
SFX 5940 N 1
SFX 5940 zny źniyjsze .
SFX 5941 N 1
SFX 5941 zny źniyjszo .
SFX 5942 N 1
SFX 5942 zny źniyjszōm .
SFX 5943 N 1
SFX 5943 zny źniyjszych .
SFX 5944 N 1
SFX 5944 zny źniyjszyj .
SFX 5945 N 1
SFX 5945 zny źniyjszymi .
SFX 5946 N 1
SFX 5946 zny źniyjszymu .
SFX 5947 N 1
SFX 5947 zny źniyjszym .
SFX 5948 N 1
SFX 5948 zny źniyjszy .
