src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
zygor/3346,3347,5868,5228,3349,3350,5230,3351,3352
zły/5839,5840,5841,5842,5843,5844,5845,5846,5847,5848,5849,5850,5851,5852,5853,5854,5855,5856,5857,5858,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
zōmb/5859,5860,5861,5862,5863,5864,5865,5866,5867
żaba/83,86,127,103,104,106,5869
żech/5870
żelazło/97,92,93,99,96,100,101,5871
żuraw/5894,5895,1057,4,1058,5896,5897,1059,1060
żyzny/5927,5928,5929,5930,5931,5932,5933,5934,5935,5936,5937,115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,5938,5939,5940,5941,5942,5943,5944,5945,5946,5947,5948
żōłty/5872,5873,5874,5875,5876,5877,5878,5879,5880,5881,5882,553,5883,5884,5885,5886,5887,5888,5889,5890,5891,5892,5893,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
żōłw/5894,5895,1057,4,1058,5896,5897,1059,1060
